Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Chapter 115. Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act

§§ 3201-3209.
Repealed. 2015, No. 7, § 2.

§ 3210.
[Reserved for future use.]

§ 3211.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Adult” means an individual who has attained 21 years of age.

“Broker” means a person lawfully engaged in the business of effecting transactions in securities or commodities for the person’s own account or for the account of others.

“Court” means the Probate Division of the Superior Court.

“Custodial property” means:

any interest in property transferred to a custodian under this chapter; and

the income from and proceeds of that interest in property.

“Custodian” means a person so designated under section 3219 of this title or a successor or substitute custodian designated under section 3228 of this title.

“Financial guardian” means a person who has been appointed by the Probate Division as financial guardian for a minor pursuant to section 2659 of this title, or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions.

“Financial institution” means a bank, trust company, savings institution, or credit union, chartered and supervised under state or federal law.

“Legal representative” means an individual’s personal representative.

“Member of the minor’s family” means the minor’s parent, stepparent, spouse, grandparent, brother, sister, uncle, or aunt, whether of the whole or half blood or by adoption.

“Minor” means an individual who has not attained 21 years of age.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, organization, or other legal entity.

“Personal representative” means an executor, administrator, successor personal representative, or special administrator of a decedent’s estate or a person legally authorized to perform substantially the same functions.

“State” includes any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and any territory or possession subject to the legislative authority of the United States.

“Transfer” means a transaction that creates custodial property under section 3219 of this title.

“Transferor” means a person who makes a transfer under this chapter.

“Trust company”’ means a financial institution, corporation, or other legal entity authorized to exercise general trust powers.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

To reflect the broader scope and the unlimited types of property to which the new Act will apply, a number of definitional changes have been made from the 1966 Act.
In addition, several definitions specifically applicable to the limited types of property (cash, securities and insurance policies) subject to the 1966 Act have been eliminated as unnecessary.
These include the definitions of “bank,” “issuer,” “life insurance policy or annuity contract,” “security,” and “transfer agent.”
No change in the meaning or construction of these terms as used in this Act is intended by such deletions.

The definitions of “domestic financial institution” and ‘insured financial institution‘ have been eliminated because few if any states limit deposits by custodians to local institutions, and the prudent person rule of section 3222(b) of this chapter may dictate the use of insured institutions as depositories, without having the Act so specify.

The principal changes or additions to the remaining definitions are discussed below.

Paragraph (2).
The definition of “benefit plan” is intentionally very broad and is meant to cover any contract, plan, system, account or trust such as a pension plan, retirement plan, death benefit plan, deferred compensation plan, employment agency arrangement or, stock bonus, option or profit sharing plan.

Paragraph (4).
The definition of “custodial property” has been generalized and expanded to encompass every conceivable legal or equitable interest in property of any kind, including real estate and tangible or intangible personal property.
The term is intended, for example, to include joint interests with right of survivorship, beneficial interests in land trusts, as well as all other intangible interests in property. Contingent or expectancy interests such as the designation as a beneficiary under insurance policies or benefit plans become “custodial property” only if the designation is irrevocable, or when it becomes so, but the Act specifically authorizes the “nomination” of a future custodian as beneficiary of such interests (see section 3213 of this chapter).
Proceeds of custodial property, both immediate and remote, are themselves custodial property, as is the case under UGMA.

Custodial property is defined without reference to the physical location of the property, even if it has one.
No useful purpose would be served by restricting the application of the Act to, for example, real estate “located in this state,” since a conveyance recorded in the state of the property’s location, if done with proper formalities, should be effective even if that state has not enacted this Act.
The rights, duties and powers of the custodian should be determined by reference to the law of the state under which the custodianship is created, assuming there is sufficient nexus under section 3212 of this chapter between that state and the transferor, the minor or the custodian.

Paragraph (10).
This definition of “minor” retains the historical age of 21 as the age of majority, even though most states have lowered the age for most other purposes, as well as in their versions of the 1966 Act.
Nevertheless, because the Internal Revenue Code continues to permit ‘minority trusts‘ under Section 2503(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, to continue in effect until age 21, and because it is believed that most donors creating minority trusts or custodianships prefer to retain the property under management for the benefit of the young person as long as possible, it is strongly suggested that the age of 21 be retained as the age of majority under this Act.

Paragraph (12).
The definition of the term “personal representative” is based upon that definition in Sec. 1-201(30) of the Uniform Probate Code.

Paragraph (14).
The new definition of “transfer” is necessary to reflect the application of the Act not only to gifts, but also to distributions from trusts and estates, obligors of the minor, and transfers of the minor’s own assets to a custodianship by the legal representative of a minor, all of which are now permitted by this Act.

Paragraph (15).
The new definition of “transferor” is required because the term includes not only the maker of a gift, i.e., a donor in the usual sense, but also fiduciaries and obligors who control or own property that is the subject of the transfer.
Nothing in this Act requires that a transferor be an “adult.”
If permitted under other law of the enacting state relating to emancipation or competence to make a will, gift, or other transfer, a minor may make an effective transfer of property to a custodian for his benefit or for the benefit of another minor.

Paragraph (16).
Only entities authorized to exercise “general” trust powers qualify as “trust companies”; that is, the authority to exercise only limited fiduciary responsibilities, such as the authority to accept Individual Retirement Account deposits, is not sufficient.

§ 3212.
Scope and jurisdiction.

This chapter applies to a transfer that refers to this chapter in the designation under subsection 3219(a) of this title by which the transfer is made if, at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of this State or the custodial property is located in this State. The custodianship so created remains subject to this chapter despite a subsequent change in residence of a transferor, the minor, or the custodian, or the removal of custodial property from this State.

A person designated as custodian under this chapter is subject to personal jurisdiction in this State with respect to any matter relating to the custodianship.

A transfer that purports to be made and which is valid under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the Uniform Gifts to Minors Act, or a substantially similar act of another state is governed by the law of the designated state, and may be executed and is enforceable in this State if, at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of the designated state, or the custodial property is located in the designated state.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section has no counterpart in the 1966 Act.
It attempts to resolve uncertainties and conflicts-of-laws questions that have frequently arisen because of the present non-uniformity of UGMA in the various states and which may continue to arise during the transition from UGMA to this Act.

The creation of a custodianship must invoke the law of a particular state because of the form of the transfer required under section 3219(a) of this chapter. This section provides that a choice of the UTMA of the enacting state is appropriate and effective if any of the nexus factors specified in subsection (a) exists at the time of the transfer.
This Act continues to govern, and subsection (b) makes the custodian accountable and subject to personal jurisdiction in the courts of the enacting state for the duration of the custodianship, despite subsequent relocation of the parties or the property.

Subsection (c) recognizes that residents of the enacting state may elect to have the law of another state apply to a transfer.
That choice is valid if a nexus with the chosen state exists at the time of the transfer.
If personal jurisdiction can be obtained in the enacting state under other law apart from this Act, the custodianship may be enforced in its courts, which are directed to apply the law of the state elected by the transferor.

If the choice of law under subsection (a) or (c) is ineffective because of the absence of the required nexus, the transfer may still be effective under the Act of another state with which a nexus does exist.
See section 3231 of this chapter.

§ 3213.
Nomination of custodian.

A person having the right to designate the recipient of property transferable upon the occurrence of a future event may revocably nominate a custodian to receive the property for a minor beneficiary upon the occurrence of the event by naming the custodian, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.” The nomination may name one or more persons as substitute custodians to whom the property must be transferred, in the order named, if the first nominated custodian dies before the transfer or is unable, declines, or is ineligible to serve. The nomination may be made in a will, a trust, a deed, an instrument exercising a power of appointment, or in a writing designating a beneficiary of contractual rights that is registered with or delivered to the payor, issuer, or other obligor of the contractual rights.

A custodian nominated under this section must be a person to whom a transfer of property of that kind may be made under subsection 3219(a) of this title.

The nomination of a custodian under this section does not create custodial property until the nominating instrument becomes irrevocable or a transfer to the nominated custodian is completed under section 3219 of this title. Unless the nomination of a custodian has been revoked, upon the occurrence of the future event, the custodianship becomes effective, and the custodian shall enforce a transfer of the custodial property pursuant to section 3219 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is new and permits a future custodian for a minor to be nominated to receive a distribution under a will or trust, or as a beneficiary of a power of appointment, or of contractual rights such as a life or endowment insurance policy, annuity contract, P.O.D. Account, benefit plan, or similar future payment right.
Nomination of a future custodian does not constitute a “transfer” under this Act and does not create custodial property.
If it did, the nomination and beneficiary designation would have to be permanent, since a “transfee” is irrevocable and indefeasibly vests ownership of the interest in the minor under section 3221(b) of this chapter.

Instead, this section permits a revocable beneficiary designation that takes effect only when the donor dies, or when a lifetime transfer to the custodian for the minor beneficiary occurs, such as a distribution under an inter vivos trust.
However, an unrevoked nomination under this section is binding on a personal representative or trustee (see section 3215(b) of this chapter) and on insurance companies and other obligors who contract to pay in the future (see section 3217(b)).

The person making the nomination may name contingent or successive future custodians to serve, in the order named, in the event that the person first nominated dies, or is unable, declines, or is ineligible to serve.
Such a substitute future custodian is a custodian “nominated . . . under Section 3213” to whom the transfer must be made under sections 3215(b) and 3217(b) of this chapter.

Any person nominated as future custodian may decline to serve before the transfer occurs and may resign at any time after the transfer.
See section 3228 of this chapter.

§ 3214.
Transfer by gift or exercise of power of appointment.

A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of a minor, pursuant to section 3219 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

To emphasize the different kinds of transfers that create presently effective custodianships under this Act, they are separately described in sections 3214, 3215, 3216 and 3217 of this chapter.
This section in part corresponds to Section 2(a) of the 1966 Act and covers the traditional lifetime gift that was the only kind of transfer authorized by the 1966 Act.
It also covers an irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a custodian, as distinguished from the exercise of a power in a revocable instrument that results only in the nomination of a future custodian under section 3213.

§ 3215.
Transfer authorized by will or trust.

A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer pursuant to section 3219 of this title to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as authorized in the governing will or trust.

If the testator or settlor has nominated a custodian under section 3213 of this title to receive the custodial property, the transfer must be made to that person.

If the testator or settlor has not nominated a custodian under section 3213 of this title, or all persons so nominated as custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative or the trustee, as the case may be, shall designate the custodian from among those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under subsection 3219(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is new and has no counterpart in the 1966 Act. It is based on nonuniform provisions adopted by Connecticut, Illinois, Wisconsin and other states to validate distributions from trusts and estates to a custodian for a minor beneficiary, when the use of a custodian is expressly authorized by the governing instrument.
It also covers the designation of the custodian whenever the settlor or testator fails to make a nomination, or the future custodian nominated under section 3213 of this chapter (and any alternate named) fails to qualify.

§ 3216.
Other transfer by fiduciary.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of a minor, pursuant to section 3219 of this title, in the absence of a will or under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a financial guardian may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of the minor, pursuant to section 3219 of this title.

A transfer under subsection (a) or (b) of this section may be made only if:

the personal representative, trustee, or financial guardian considers the transfer to be in the best interest of the minor;

the transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent with provisions of the applicable will, trust agreement, or other governing instrument; and

the transfer is authorized by the court if it exceeds $10,000.00 in value.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is new and has no counterpart in the 1966 Act. It covers a new concept, already authorized by the law of some states through nonuniform amendments to the 1966 Act, to permit custodianships to be used as guardianship or conservator substitutes, even though not specifically authorized by the person whose property is the subject of the transfer.
It also permits the legal representative of the minor, such as a conservator or guardian, to transfer the minor’s own property to a new or existing custodianship for the purposes of convenience or economies of administration.

A custodianship may be created under this section even though not specifically authorized by the transferor, the testator, or the settlor of the trust if three tests are satisfied. First, the fiduciary making the transfer must determine in good faith and in his fiduciary capacity that a custodianship will be in the best interests of the minor.
Second, a custodianship may not be prohibited by, or inconsistent with, the terms of any governing instrument.
Inconsistent terms would include, for example, a spendthrift clause in a governing trust, provisions terminating a governing trust for the minor’s benefit at a time other than the time of the minor’s age of majority, and provisions for mandatory distributions of income or principal at specific times or periodic intervals.
Provisions for other outright distributions or bequests would not be inconsistent with the creation of a custodianship under this section.
Third, the amount of property transferred (as measured by its value) must be of such relatively small amount that the lack of court supervision and the typically stricter investment standards that would apply to the conservator otherwise required will not be important.
However, if the property is of significant size, transfer to a custodian may still be made if the court approves and if the other two tests are met.

The custodianship created under this section without express authority in the governing instrument will terminate upon the minor’s attainment of the statutory age of majority of the enacting state apart from this Act, i.e., at the same age a conservatorship of the minor would end. See section 3220 of this chapter and the accompanying Comment.

§ 3217.
Transfer by obligor.

Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, a person not subject to section 3215 or 3216 of this title who holds property of or owes a liquidated debt to a minor not having a financial guardian may make an irrevocable transfer to a custodian for the benefit of the minor, pursuant to section 3219 of this title.

If a person having the right to do so under section 3213 of this title has nominated a custodian under that section to receive the custodial property, the transfer shall be made to that person.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section is new and, like section 3216 of this chapter, permits a custodianship to be established as a substitute for a conservator to receive payments due a minor from sources other than estates, trusts, and existing guardianships covered by sections 3215 and 3216.
For example, a tort judgment debtor of a minor, a bank holding a joint or P.O.D. account of which a minor is the surviving payee, or an insurance company holding life insurance policy or benefit plan proceeds payable to a minor may create a custodianship under this section.

Use of this section is mandatory when a future custodian has been nominated under section 3213 of this chapter as a named beneficiary of an insurance policy, benefit plan, deposit account, or the like, because the original owner of the property specified a custodianship (and a future custodian) to receive the property.
If that custodian (or any alternate named) is not available, if none was nominated, or none could have been nominated (as in the case of a tort judgment payable to the minor), this section is permissive and does not preclude the obligor from requiring the appointment of a conservator to receive payment.
It allows the obligor to transfer to a custodian unless the property exceeds the stated value, in which case a conservator must be appointed to receive it.

§ 3218.
Receipt for custodial property.

A written acknowledgment of delivery by a custodian constitutes a sufficient receipt and discharge for custodial property transferred to the custodian, pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

This section discharges transferors from further responsibility for custodial property delivered to and receipted for by the custodian.
See also section 3226 of this chapter which protects transferors and other third parties dealing with custodians.
Because a discharge or release for a donative transfer is not necessary, this section had no counterpart in the 1966 Act.

This section does not authorize an existing custodian, or a custodian to whom an obligor makes a transfer under section 3217 of this chapter, to settle or release a claim of the minor against a third party. Only a conservator, guardian ad litem or other person authorized under other law to act for the minor may release such a claim.

§ 3219.
Manner of creating custodial property and effecting transfer; designation of initial custodian; control.

Custodial property is created and a transfer is made whenever:

An uncertificated security or a certificated security in registered form is either:

registered in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

delivered if in certificated form, or any document necessary for the transfer of an uncertificated security is delivered, together with any necessary endorsement to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company as custodian, accompanied by an instrument in substantially the form set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

Money is paid or delivered to a broker or financial institution for credit to an account in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

The ownership of a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract is either:

registered with the issuer in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act”; or

assigned in a writing delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company whose name in the assignment is followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

An irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment or an irrevocable present right to future payment under a contract is the subject of a written notification delivered to the payor, issuer, or other obligor that the right is transferred to the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, whose name in the notification is followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

An interest in real property is recorded in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

A certificate of title issued by a department or agency of a state or of the United States that evidences title to tangible personal property is either:

issued in the name of the transferor, an adult other than the transferor, or a trust company, followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

delivered to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company, endorsed to that person followed in substance by the words: “as custodian for _______________ (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.”

An interest in any property not described in subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection is transferred to an adult other than the transferor or to a trust company by a written instrument in substantially the form set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

An instrument in the following form satisfies the requirements of subdivisions (a)(1)(B) and (a)(7) of this section:

Click to view

A transferor shall place the custodian in control of the custodial property as soon as practicable.

“TRANSFER UNDER THE VERMONT UNIFORM TRANSFERS TO MINORS ACT I, (name of transferor or name and representative capacity if a fiduciary) hereby transfer to (name of custodian), as custodian for (name of minor) under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, the following: (insert a description of the custodial property sufficient to identify it). Dated: (Signature) (name of custodian) acknowledges receipt of the property described above as custodian for the minor named above under the Vermont Uniform Transfers to Minors Act. Dated: (Signature of Custodian)”

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The 1966 Act contained optional bracketed language permitting an adopting state to limit the class of eligible initial custodians to an adult member of the minor’s family or a guardian of the minor.
This optional limitation has been deleted because it would preclude the use of an individual and uncompensated custodian if no qualified or willing family member is available.

Otherwise, with respect to transfers of securities, cash, and insurance or annuity contracts, this section tracks the cognate provisions of subsection 2(a) of the 1966 Act, with one exception. Under subsection (a)(1)(ii) of this section, a transfer of securities in registered form may be accomplished without registering the transfer in the name of the custodian so that transfers may be accomplished more expeditiously, and so that securities may be held by custodians in street name. In other words, subsection (a)(1)(i) is not the exclusive manner for making effective transfers of securities in registered form.

In addition, subsection (a) creates new procedures for handling the additional types of property now subject to the Act; specifically:

Paragraph (3) covers the irrevocable transfer of ownership of life and endowment insurance policies and annuity contracts.

Paragraph (4) covers the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment and the irrevocable present assignment of future payment rights, such as royalties, interest and principal payments under a promissory note, or beneficial interests under life or endowment or annuity insurance contracts or benefit plans.
The payor, issuer, or obligor may require additional formalities such as completion of a specific assignment form and an endorsement, but the transfer is effective upon delivery of the notification.
See section 3213 of this chapter and the accompanying Comment for the procedure for revocably “nominating” a future custodian as a beneficiary of a power of appointment or such payment rights.

Paragraph (5) is the exclusive method for the transfer of real estate and includes a disposition effected by will.
Under the law of those states in which a devise of real estate vests in the devisee without the need for a deed from the personal representative of the decedent, a document such as the will must still be “recorded” under this provision to make the transfer effective.
For inter vivos transfers, of course, a conveyance in recordable form would be employed for dispositions of real estate to a custodian.

Paragraph (6) covers the transfer of personal property such as automobiles, aircraft, patent rights, and other property subject to registration of ownership with a state or federal agency.
Either registration of the transfer in the name of the custodian or delivery of the endorsed certificate in registerable form makes the transfer effective.

Paragraph (7) is a residual classification, covering all property not otherwise covered in the preceding paragraphs. Examples would include nonregistered securities, partnership interests, and tangible personal property not subject to title certificates.

The form of transfer document recommended and set forth in subsection (b) contains an acceptance that must be executed by the custodian to make the disposition effective.
While such a form of written acceptance is not specifically required in the case of registered securities under subsection (a)(1), money under (a)(2), insurance contracts or interests under (a)(3) or (4), real estate under (a)(5), or titled personal property under (a)(6), it is certainly the better and recommended practice to obtain the acknowledgment, consent, and acceptance of the designated custodian on the instrument of transfer, or otherwise.

A transferor may create a custodianship by naming himself as custodian, except for transfers of securities under subsection (a)(1)(ii), insurance and annuity contracts under (a)(3)(ii), and titled personalty under (a)(6)(ii), which are made without registering them in the name of the custodian, and transfers of the residual class of property covered by (a)(7).
In all of these cases a transfer of possession and control to a third party is necessary to establish donative intent and consummation of the transfer, and designation of the transferor as custodian renders the transfer invalid under section 3221(a)(2) of this chapter.

Note, also, that the Internal Revenue Service takes the position that custodial property is includable in the gross estate of the donor if the donor appoints himself or herself custodian and dies while serving in that capacity before the minor attains the age of 21.
Rev. Rul. 57-366, C.B. 1957-2, 618; Rev. Rul. 59-357, C.B. 1959-2, 212; Rev. Rul. 70-348, C.B. 1970-2, 193;
Estate of Prudowsky v. Comm’r,
55 T.C. 890 (1971),
affd. per curiam, 465 F.2d 62 (7th Cir. 1972).

This Act has been drafted in an attempt to avoid income attribution to the parent or inclusion of custodial insurance policies on a custodian’s life in the estate of the custodian through the changes made in the standards for expenditure of custodial property and the custodian’s incidents of ownership in custodial property.
See sections 3223 and 3224 of this chapter and the accompanying Comments.
However, the much greater problem of inclusion of custodial property in the estate of the donor who serves as custodian remains. Therefore, despite the fact that this section of the Act permits it in the case of registered securities, money, life insurance, real estate, and personal property subject to titling laws, it is generally still inadvisable for a donor to appoint himself custodian or for a parent of the minor to serve as custodian.
See, generally Sections 2036 and 2038 of the Internal Revenue Code and rulings and cases cited above; with respect to gifts of closely held stock when a donor retains voting rights by serving as custodian, see Section 2036(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, overruling
U.S. v. Byrum,
408 U.S. 125 (1972), rehearing denied 409 U.S. 898.

Subsection (c) tracks in substance Section 2(c) of the 1966 Act.
However, it replaces the requirement that the transferor “promptly do all things within his power” to complete the transfer, with the requirement that such action must be taken “as soon as practicable.”
This change is intended only to reflect the fact that possession and control of property transferred from an estate can rarely be accomplished with the immediacy that the term “promptly” may have implied.
In the case of inter vivos transfers, no relaxation of the former requirement is intended, since “prompt” transfer of dominion is usually practicable.

§ 3220.
Single custodianship.

A transfer may be made only for one minor, and only one person may be the custodian. All custodial property held under this chapter by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

The first sentence follows Section 2(b) of the 1966 Act.
The second sentence states what was implicit in the 1966 Act, that additional transfers at different times and from different sources may be made to an existing custodian for the minor and do not create multiple custodianships. This provision also permits an existing custodian to be named as successor custodian by another custodian for the same minor who resigns under section 3228 of this chapter for the purpose of consolidating the assets in a single custodianship.

Note, however, that these results are limited to transfers made “under this Act.”
Gifts previously made under the enacting state’s UGMA or under the UGMA or UTMA of another state must be treated as separate custodianships, even though the same custodian and minor are involved, because of possible differences in the age of distribution and custodian’s powers under those other Acts.

Even when all transfers to a single custodian are made “under this Act” and a single custodianship results, custodial property transferred under sections 3216 and 3217 of this chapter must be accounted for separately from property transferred under sections 3214 and 3215 because the custodianship will terminate sooner with respect to the former property if the enacting state has a statutory age of majority lower than 21.
See section 3230 and the Comment thereto.

§ 3221.
Validity and effect of transfer.

The validity of a transfer made in a manner prescribed in this chapter is not affected by:

failure of the transferor to comply with subsection 3219(c) of this title concerning possession and control;

designation of an ineligible custodian, except designation of the transferor in the case of property for which the transferor is ineligible to serve as custodian under subsection 3219(a) of this title; or

death or incapacity of a person nominated under section 3213 of this title or designated under section 3219 of this title as custodian or the disclaimer of the office by that person.

A transfer made pursuant to section 3219 of this title is irrevocable, and the custodial property is indefeasibly vested in the minor, but the custodian has all the rights, powers, duties, and authority provided in this chapter, and the minor, the minor’s legal representative, and the minor’s financial guardian have no right, power, duty, or authority with respect to the custodial property except as provided in this chapter.

By making a transfer, the transferor incorporates in the disposition all the provisions of this chapter, and grants to the custodian, and to any third person dealing with a person designated as custodian, the respective powers, rights, and immunities provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 7

, § 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT

Subsection (a) generally tracks Section 2(c) of the 1966 Act, except that the transferor’s designation of himself as custodian of property for which he is not eligible to serve under section 3219(a)
of this chapter makes the transfer ineffective.
See Comment to section 3219.

The balance of this section generally tracks Section 3 of the 1966 Act with a number of necessary, and perhaps significant, changes required by the new kinds of property subject to custodianships.
The 1966 Act provides that a transfer made in accordance with its terms “conveys to the minor indefeasibly vested legal title to the [custodial property].”
Because equitable interests in property may be the subject of a transfer under this Act, the reference to “legal title” has been deleted, but no change concerning the effect or finality of the transfer is intended.

However, subsection (b) qualifies the rights of the minor in the property by making them subject to “the rights, powers, duties and authority” of the custodian under this Act, a concept that may have been implicit and intended in the 1966 Act, but not expressed.
The concept is important because of the kinds of property, particularly real estate, now subject to custodianship.
If the minor is married, it would be possible for homestead, dower, or community property rights to attach to real estate (or other property) acquired after marriage by the minor through a transfer to a custodianship for his benefit.
The quoted language qualifying the minor’s interest in the property is intended to override these rights insofar as they may conflict with the custodian’s ability and authority to manage, sell, or transfer such property while it is custodial property.
Upon termination of the custodianship and transfer of the custodial property to the former minor, the custodial property would then become subject to such spousal rights for the first time.

For a list of the immunities enjoyed by third persons under subsection (c), see section 3226 of this chapter and the accompanying Comment.

Because a custodianship under this Act can extend beyond the age of majority in many states, or beyond emancipation of a minor through marriage or otherwise, the Drafting Committee considered the addition of a spendthrift clause to this section.
The idea was rejected because neither the 1966 Act nor its predecessors had such a provision, because spendthrift protection would extend only until 21 in any event and judgments against the minor would then be enforceable, and because the spendthrift qualification on the interest of the minor in the property may be inconsistent with the theory of the Act to convey the property indefeasibly to the minor.